Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1216
Motorboat; application for registration;
issuance of a certificate of number; how displayed.

After
the owner of the vessel submits an application as provided in section 37-1214
and presents a certificate of title if required pursuant to section 37-1276,
the county treasurer shall enter the application upon the records of
the office and issue to the applicant a certificate of number stating the
number awarded to the vessel and the name and address of the owner. The number
shall be displayed on each side of the bow, and the numbers shall be at least
three inches high, of block characteristics, contrasting in color with the
boat, and clearly visible from a distance of one hundred feet. The commission
shall assign each county treasurer a block of numbers and certificates
therefor.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 16;

Laws 1994, LB 123, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 464, § 4;

Laws 1997, LB 720, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 8.